Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.375

Sexual misconduct—Postsecondary educational institutions—Personal information of witnesses and victims.

(1) For the purposes of RCW 28B.112.040 through 28B.112.080 regarding postsecondary educational institutions, personal identifying information in an employee personnel file, student file, investigation file, settlement agreement, or other files held by a postsecondary educational institution that reveals the identity of witnesses to or victims of sexual misconduct committed at the postsecondary educational institution by an employee of the institution are exempt from public disclosure and copying. If the victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure of the victim's or witness' personal identifying information, such desire shall govern.

(2) For purposes of this section, "witness" does not mean an employee under investigation for allegations of sexual misconduct.

[ 2020 c 335 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 335: See note following RCW 28B.112.040.